src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/pt.aff
SET ISO8859-1
TRY aerisontcdmlupvgbfz h qj x       ACMPSBTELGRIFVDkHJON ywUKXZWQ Y       


PFX A Y 1
PFX A   0              anti           [^hirs]

PFX S Y 2
PFX S   0              des            [^h]
PFX S   h              des            h

PFX I Y 4
PFX I   0              in             [^plmr]
PFX I   0              im             p
PFX I   0              i              [lm]
PFX I   0              ir             r

PFX R Y 2
PFX R   0              re             [^s]
PFX R   0              res            s

PFX u Y 1
PFX u   0              sub            [^bhr]

PFX F Y 3
PFX F   0              ultra          .
PFX F   0              super          .
PFX F   0              hiper          .

SFX T Y 6
SFX T   0              bi             .
SFX T   0              tris           s
SFX T   0              tri            [^s]
SFX T   0              tetra          .
SFX T   0              penta          .
SFX T   0              hexa           .

SFX p Y 15
SFX p   0              s              [^ ][^lsmrnzx]
SFX p   0              s               e
SFX p    o              es             o
SFX p   l              is             [au]l
SFX p   ol              is            ol
SFX p   el              is            [^v]el
SFX p   el              is            [^     ]vel
SFX p   l              is             [     ]vel
SFX p   l              s              il
SFX p   0              es             [^   ]s
SFX p    s             ases            s
SFX p    s             eses            s
SFX p    s             eses            s
SFX p   m              ns             m
SFX p   0              es             [rnzx]

SFX a Y 4
SFX a   0              s               o
SFX a   il             eis            il
SFX a   os             as             entos
SFX a   0              s              [^aeiouls]

SFX e Y 2
SFX e   0              es             l
SFX e   o              es              o

SFX f Y 12
SFX f   o              a              [^ ]o
SFX f   o              as             [^ ]o
SFX f   0              a              [^aeiouscn]
SFX f   0              as             [^aeiouscn]
SFX f   0              a              [^ ]s
SFX f   0              as             [^ ]s
SFX f    s             esa             s
SFX f    s             esas            s
SFX f    o             ona             o
SFX f    o             onas            o
SFX f   e              a              e
SFX f   e              as             e

SFX k Y 6
SFX k   o              a              [^ ]o
SFX k   0              a              [^aeiouscn]
SFX k   0              a              [^ ]s
SFX k    s             esa             s
SFX k    o             ona             o
SFX k   e              a              e

SFX b Y 4
SFX b   o              0               o
SFX b   o              s               o
SFX b   0              ssa            e
SFX b   0              ssas           e

SFX g Y 2
SFX g    o             oa              o
SFX g    o             oas             o

SFX m Y 5
SFX m   o              amente         o
SFX m   0              amente         u
SFX m   0              mente          [^v][^q][^uo]
SFX m    vel           avelmente       vel
SFX m    vel           ivelmente       vel

SFX H Y 37
SFX H   0              amente         dor
SFX H    rio           oriamente       rio
SFX H    rio           ariamente       rio
SFX H    tico          aticamente      tico
SFX H    ctico         acticamente     ctico
SFX H    nico          onicamente      nico
SFX H    gico          ogicamente      gico
SFX H    fero          iferamente      fero
SFX H    tico          eticamente      tico
SFX H    stico         isticamente     stico
SFX H    ssimo         issimamente     ssimo
SFX H    tico          iticamente      tico
SFX H    fico          aficamente      fico
SFX H    trico         etricamente     trico
SFX H    mico          omicamente      mico
SFX H    rico          ericamente      rico
SFX H    tico          oticamente      tico
SFX H    ceo           aceamente       ceo
SFX H    stico         asticamente     stico
SFX H    cio           iciamente       cio
SFX H    fico          ificamente      fico
SFX H    aco           iacamente       aco
SFX H    lico          olicamente      lico
SFX H    rico          oricamente      rico
SFX H    nico          enicamente      nico
SFX H    dico          odicamente      dico
SFX H    pico          opicamente      pico
SFX H    lico          alicamente      lico
SFX H    rmico         ermicamente     rmico
SFX H    voro          ivoramente      voro
SFX H    bico          abicamente      bico
SFX H    filo          ofilamente      filo
SFX H    lico          elicamente      lico
SFX H    mico          emicamente      mico
SFX H    nio           oniamente       nio
SFX H    sico          asicamente      sico
SFX H    gico          agicamente      gico

SFX q Y 32
SFX q   ologia          logo          ologia
SFX q   ologia          loga          ologia
SFX q   ologia          logos         ologia
SFX q   ologia          logas         ologia
SFX q   afia            fico          afia
SFX q   afia            fica          afia
SFX q   afia            ficos         afia
SFX q   afia            ficas         afia
SFX q   omania          mano          omania
SFX q   omania          mana          omania
SFX q   omania          manos         omania
SFX q   omania          manas         omania
SFX q   ofobia          fobo          ofobia
SFX q   ofobia          foba          ofobia
SFX q   ofobia          fobos         ofobia
SFX q   ofobia          fobas         ofobia
SFX q   ofilia          filo          ofilia
SFX q   ofilia          fila          ofilia
SFX q   ofilia          filos         ofilia
SFX q   ofilia          filas         ofilia
SFX q    dio           ida            c dio
SFX q    dio           idas           c dio
SFX q   ia             a              patia
SFX q   ia             as             patia
SFX q   ura            or             cultura
SFX q   ura            ora            cultura
SFX q   ura            ores           cultura
SFX q   ura            oras           cultura
SFX q   cia            ta             cracia
SFX q   cia            tas            cracia
SFX q   smo            sta            e smo
SFX q   smo            stas           e smo
