src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/pt.dic
abade/pb
aborto/pA
ac  o/pI
acordo/pSE
actividade/Ip
activo/pfmdI
actualizar/XYRSDcv
adaptabilidade/Ip
ado ante/p
adormecer/XYRMD
adverso/fdpm
aer bico/fp
afeg o/ab
agendar/XYMR
agravar/XYSMn
aju zes/S
alde o/bp
aleg rico/pfH
alem o/eb
algarvio/fp
alinhar/XYMDR
alter vel/pI
alto/pfms
alucinog no/fp
anci o/a
androfobia/q
anfitri o/pb
anglicanismo/p
an o/pb
antepen ltimo/fp
anticrist o/ab
antite smo/pq
aparelhar/XYSM
apropriado/pfmS
aproveitar/XYRScMDnvu
aproximar/XYcBR
arabesco/p
aracnofilia/q
arbitr rio/fpH
aritm tico/fp
arqueologia/rqt
arrendar/XYcMDvu
artes o/ab
artr tico/Apf
assonante/p
astrologia/qr
atencioso/fpSm
at mico/pfu
aut ntico/pf
autocr tico/fpH
autografia/q
aval/te
aventuroso/fpm
bacilo/p
backup/a
barros o/bp
bas ltico/fp
beir o/pb
berib rico/fp
bibliofobia/q
biografia/pqr
b n  o/a
bobo/fpG
bole/R
bret o/pb
brig o/p
b sico/pfH
bug/a
bulas/R
cabeleiro/f
cafeicultura/pq
calmo/fpm
camisaria/p
campe o/pbTxV
campeonato/pT
canceroso/pfA
cantor/fp
capel o/e
capitalizar/XYcvSR
capit o/be
cardiopatia/pqr
carro/phA
cartomante/p
catal o/eb
categoria/pu
categ rico/fpH
cat lico/fp
centen rio/pfT
charlataria/p
charlat o/e
chip/a
chorudo/pfm
ciclo/ptiu
ciclone/pA
cidad o/ab
cimeiro/fp
cinematografia/pqr
classe/pF
cleptomania/pqr
c modo/Ipf
c ndido/fpm
c nsul/xVe
c o/eh
cobri/SR
cobrimos/SR
coimbr o/pb
colonial/ptiA
col rico/pfH
colura/SS
comedeiro/f
comedimos/S
come o/pRS
comiss rio/pfu
compatibilidade/Ip
complexo/pfmd
comum/pmI
comunicativo/fpI
conceptual/pmti
concessionar/XYu
concess o/pu
concidad o/a
conclusivo/pfIm
conde/pb
condicional/pidIm
condigno/dpmf
conformista/Ip
congelante/Ap
conhecer/XYSMDnv
conjugal/ApEO
consagrar/XYRScDnv
conselheiro/fpmi
consinto/S
constru da/S
construiriam/S
constru s/S
contest vel/pI
contextualizar/XYncRS
continente/pu
contingente/pmip
contorno/p
contrair/KvSB
contratar/XYRSDnvcu
coprofilia/q
correspondente/pmp
cortes o/ab
corujeiro/f
cotonicultura/pq
cred vel/dIp
creiamos/S
criatividade/p
crime/pA
criptologia/qt
crist o/ab
crom tico/fpH
crustaceologia/qt
cubra/SRSRSR
cubramos/SRSR
cultura/ptiu
d bio/fp
d cil/a
decorar/XYcDvR
defeituoso/fpm
defini  o/pI
delegacia/u
delinquente/p
democracia/Aqp
democr tico/fpAH
departamento/pu
depressivo/fpA
derrapante/Ap
descobrimos/R
descubramos/R
desdenhoso/fpm
desgostoso/fp
deslizante/Ap
desportivo/pfimA
destru am/S
destruireis/S
destru reis/S
detonante/Ap
dialecto/pu
digital/pm
diplom tico/fpH
direc  o/pI
director/pfuxV
discografia/pq
discriminativo/Ifp
domabilidade/Ip
dom nio/up
dom stico/fp
dossier/a
dr stico/fpH
duplo/fpm
duzentos/a
editar/XYR
educativo/fp
eficiente/Ipm
electr nico/pfH
emaranhar/XYS
empedernir/YSM
emprego/pu
empreiteiro/puf
emp tico/fpH
encalhar/XYScM
encaminhar/XYRSMD
encolerizar/XYS
enferrujar/XYMS
enra ze/SS
ensinar/XYRMDv
epis dico/pfH
erguer/XYR
escrutinador/fp
escultura/pq
esp cie/up
especial/pmtds
especulativo/fp
estatut rio/pfH
est ril/a
etimol gico/fpH
etnomusicologia/prq
evolver/XYRDn
expe as/R
expe o/R
expresso/pfm
extraterritorialidade/p
fadigar/XYS
farfalhudo/fp
fascismo/pAO
federal/tiA
fict cio/fpH
fidelidade/Ip
filo/pu
florescer/XYRMn
fogo/pA
fonofobia/q
fon tico/fpH
formal/pmtid
formic voro/pf
fornecedor/fup
fratric dio/pq
fr gil/a
f ssil/a
furibundo/fp
geogr fico/pfH
g nero/up
gracioso/fpdm
grande/pms
gr cil/a
guardi o/bp
habitar/XYScDnv
h bil/a
heliografia/pq
herdeiro/fp
heredit rio/pfH
higi nico/fpHA
hiperb lico/fpH
holografia/pq
honor fico/fpH
humano/pfmtidSu
iconografia/pqr
imagin rio/pfH
imbecilidade/p
impass vel/md
impresso/pfR
inchar/XYcMSB
inclusivo/fm
inconfesso/fp
indivis vel/pmd
inodoro/fp
inofensivo/pfm
inscri  o/pR
interesseiro/fpSm
in til/a
inven  o/pR
invernoso/fp
investes/RS
investir/YRSMD
invistamos/RSRS
irm o/ab
ir nico/pfH
isl mico/fpA
justi a/pI
justific vel/pI
lagostim/p
lan o/pu
lascivo/m
le o/pg
let o/pb
liberal/pmtidA
ligar/XYScMn
litor neo/fp
lun tico/fpH
majest tico/fpH
mal/e
malicioso/fp
maligno/fpmd
mandri o/bp
m dico/fp
me a/RR
medes/R
megalomania/pqr
melodram tico/fpH
mineral gico/fpH
m ltiplo/pfpu
m o/a
modesto/fpmIs
monografia/pqr
moral/pmtid
morangueiro/f
motiva  o/S
m ssil/a
m trico/fpH
mundo/pu
nascer/XYRMnv
nazi/pA
nazista/pA
neurologia/qtr
n o/a
nortenho/fp
novecentos/a
numerador/fp
objectivo/pfmtidu
obrigado/sk
obstipante/A
obstru a/S
obstruindo/S
obstruiu/S
obstru sses/S
oculto/pftim
oftalmologia/qtr
origin rio/pfH
overflow/a
paciente/pmIp
pag o/ab
paleologia/qt
paralela/p
parteiro/fp
password/a
patriota/piA
pecaminoso/mfp
penitente/pmI
perdul rio/pfH
perfeito/pfIms
personalizar/XYSLc
pescar/XYDR
pictografia/pq
pitag rico/fp
p o/eh
polar/pu
porcino/fp
port til/a
potencial/pmd
pragm tico/fpH
presidente/pTxV
processar/XYMDvER
produtivo/pfmidu
profissional/pmi
proposta/p
protec  o/pSF
pr tico/fpH
psicografia/pq
puberdade/EIp
puritano/fpi
quatrocentos/a
quest o/pu
racionalidade/Ip
racismo/Ap
rede/pu
redundante/pm
rega o/p
regional/ptimu
regulamentar/pAXYcS
regular/pdImXYBcMSDv
regularidade/Ip
representar/XYcDnvu
republicano/fpiA
respons vel/pdIm
revisor/fp
rizicultura/prq
rotativo/ftidmp
roubo/pA
r ptil/a
sacrist o/e
sa de/RR
salame/p
saudeis/R
sector/pu
seguro/pfmdIs
seiscentos/a
semita/ipA
setecentos/a
sexag simo/fp
simb lico/pfH
simples/m
sismologia/qr
s o/ab
social/pmtiA
socket/a
socr tico/fpH
solu ante/p
sol vel/pdI
s t o/a
submarino/pfA
submiss o/pI
sudor fico/pfA
suficiente/pIm
suscept vel/pdm
suspeito/fp
sustent vel/pdI
tecel o/pb
telepatia/pqr
temer rio/pfH
terci rio/fp
terrorista/Ap
toxicologia/pqr
traidor/pfH
transversal/pmd
tremendo/fpm
tribo/pu
tumultuoso/fp
t xtil/a
utilizar/XYcDvRu
veneno/pA
ven reo/fpA
veros mil/Ia
veross mil/Ia
vil o/bp
visconde/pb
visitar/XYcDnvR
vis vel/pmdI
vitelino/fp
v o/ab
volatilidade/p
vol til/a
voluptuoso/fdpm
xerografia/pq
